Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.01, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Shared time pupils. "Shared time pupils" means those pupils whonew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end attend public school programs for part of the regular school daynew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) attend public school career and technical education programs offered for secondary credit outside of the regular school day;new text end and who otherwise fulfill the requirements of section 120A.22 by attendance at a nonpublic school. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2025-2026 school year and later. new text end